West Virginia, session 2026, HB4794.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. state superintendent of schools. §18-3-14. Test on United States Constitution required to graduate high school. (a) In order to be eligible for graduation from high school in West Virginia, a student shall satisfactorily pass a test or tests on the provisions and principles of the United States Constitution at some time during grades nine through 12.(b) The contents of the test shall be created by the State Board of Education and administered to local county boards of education for distribution to students across West Virginia.(c) The test on the United States Constitution shall provide for a rigorous understanding of the document, shall require a high passing grade (85 percent or better), and the contents of the test shall be available to the public for review.(d) High school students who unsuccessfully take the test shall be eligible to re-take the test a week after their first attempt and shall thereafter be provided the opportunity to take the test until they have reached the necessary threshold for passage. The ultimate goal of the test is to provide that graduating seniors have an acute knowledge of the contents of the United States Constitution.(e) This section shall become effective on July 1, 2026.